Utah statutes.
72-5-404.   Disposition of excess property rights.

If the department has acquired property rights in land in proposed transportation corridors, and some or all of that land is eventually not used for the proposed transportation corridors, the department shall dispose of the property rights in accordance with the provisions of Section 78B-6-521.

